California statutes. Education Code
(b) (1) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, in coordination with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, may award up to three grants, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) each, to collaboratives formed for the purpose of offering teacher credential coursework remotely at a participating community college or colleges. For the purposes of this section, a collaborative shall be comprised of at least one community college and at least one accredited degree-granting institution of higher education.

(2) (A) Priority for the receipt of grant funds may be given to a collaborative that meets all of the following:

(i) Is located in areas of the state with
 low rates of K–12 credentialed public school teachers.

(ii) Demonstrates that its teacher credentialing degree program or programs meet a documented labor market demand of the collaborative’s target region.

(iii) Identifies the resources necessary to offer a teacher credentialing degree program or programs.

(B) The funds granted under this subdivision shall be for one-time startup costs of the collaborative for the purposes of developing and implementing its pilot program. These costs may include any, or any combination, including all, of the following:

(i) Professional development for effective distance learning.

(ii) Deploying a teaching assistant for the community college classroom or classrooms where courses are offered via distance learning.

(iii) Technology upgrades for the community college classroom or classrooms where the distance learning courses are offered.

(iv) Student retention, outreach, or engagement.

(v) Data monitoring and systems infrastructure.

(vi) Cross system alignment.

(vii) Other startup costs that are necessary for developing and implementing its pilot program.

(C) Each pilot program implemented under this section shall do
 all of the following:

(i) Utilize courses currently offered by the collaborating accredited degree-granting institution or institutions of higher education, which may be one or more California State University or University of California campuses, or one or more independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, with a physical presence in this state.

(ii) Include, as a primary target population to take courses under the pilot program, teachers who hold a baccalaureate degree and are currently teaching on a short-term staff permit or a provisional internship permit.

(iii) Charge no more than the standard
 tuition and fees of the collaborating accredited teacher-credentialing, degree-granting institution or institutions of higher education.

(iv) Involve current faculty from the collaborating accredited
 degree-granting institution or institutions of higher education as faculty for courses offered under the pilot program, which shall be current courses of that institution or institutions.

(c) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that no collaborative funded under this section may be terminated abruptly, thus leaving its enrolled students without a way to earn a teaching credential under this section.

(2) As a condition of an agreement for the receipt of a grant under this section, each collaborative shall ensure that every student who enrolls in its pilot program before an announcement of the termination of the collaborative has an opportunity to complete the coursework necessary to obtain a teaching credential under this section.

(d) A collaborative shall not offer a teacher credentialing degree program under this section unless that program has been accredited by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing’s Committee on Accreditation on the basis of standards of program quality and effectiveness.

(e) Grants awarded under this section shall be awarded only to the extent that funding for this section is provided in the annual Budget Act.

(f) (1) On or before April 1, 2023, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall submit a report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Department of Finance on the implementation of the program established pursuant to this section.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on April 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 603, Sec. 3.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Support Services for Justice-Involved Students [78070. - 78076.]

78070.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Justice-involved” means a person who is currently or formerly incarcerated in a California correctional facility, or currently or formerly detained in a juvenile facility.

(b) “Rising Scholars Network” means the program established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 78071.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78071.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may establish a program to enter into agreements with community colleges to provide additional funds for services in support of postsecondary education for justice-involved students. This program shall be known as the Rising Scholars Network, and shall expand the number of justice-involved students participating and succeeding in the community colleges and shall not displace other students.

(b) A community college district that wishes to participate in the Rising Scholars Network shall apply to the board of governors for funding pursuant to this article. The application of each participating community
 college district shall identify the Rising Scholars college or colleges in the district, and shall include, but not be limited to, the number of justice-involved students who will be served. The application shall also describe the extent of cooperation between the college and local criminal justice stakeholders, including, as applicable, wardens, county sheriffs, juvenile facilities, and probation departments. Beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year, the board of governors may prioritize funding provided in the annual Budget Act for applications submitted pursuant to this article that demonstrate positive student outcomes consistent with the goals and guidance described in Section 78072.

(c) To the maximum extent feasible, funds received by a
 community college under this article shall be used for, but not be limited to, any of the following supports and services:

(1) Providing any of the following for programs serving all justice-involved students, whether on campus or in custody:

(A) Academic counseling or advising that provides clear pathways.

(B) Academic tutoring.

(C) Financial aid information and application assistance.

(D) Frequent in-person contact.

(E) Professional development for faculty and staff.

(2) Providing any of the following for programs serving formerly incarcerated students on
 campus:

(A) Peer-to-peer support or mentoring.

(B) Assistance with accessing campus resources, including admissions, financial aid, and student services.

(C) Career counseling and, as feasible, placement services.

(D) Assistance with accessing community resources, including record clearance, housing assistance, mental health support, and social services.

(3) Providing either of the following for programs serving currently incarcerated or detained students:

(A) Transitional materials and services to support students in enrollment and persistence in higher education upon release.

(B) Parity of academic supports and services as provided on campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 8.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

78072.

The board of governors shall adopt regulations for the Rising Scholars Network that fulfill the following goals and guidance:

(a) Participating colleges designate a staff program director, coordinator, or liaison who has experience working with currently or formerly incarcerated students.

(b) Funded programs are supported with a dedicated campus meeting space.

(c) Funded programs build support and competency from a broad range of college stakeholders.

(d) Participating colleges offer and make accessible a range of student supports to address academic and nonacademic
 needs.

(e) Funded programs foster peer mentors, as applicable.

(f) Funded programs develop and maintain strong relationships with external partners, including community-based programs, probation, parole, and county jails.

(g) Participating colleges provide or connect justice-involved students with direct student financial support for critical needs.

(h) Funded programs outreach and respond to prospective justice-involved students, particularly those in jail or prison.

(i) Funded programs help justice-involved students apply, matriculate, and persist to graduation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78073.

The board of governors shall be responsible for the administration of funds for the Rising Scholars Network. To the extent possible, services provided under this article to justice-involved students shall be coordinated with, and shall not supplant, other services provided by the county and state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78074.

The board of governors may authorize the chancellor, consistent with the requirements the board may impose, to designate up to 5 percent of the funds allocated pursuant to this article for program administration, program development, and program accountability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78075.

Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 31, 2023, and every two years thereafter, the board of governors shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and all relevant legislative policy and budget subcommittees describing its efforts to serve justice-involved students. The reports shall include recommendations on whether and how the Rising Scholars Network under this article can be expanded to all community college districts and campuses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

78076.

This article shall be operative in a fiscal year only if funds have been appropriated for purposes of this article for that fiscal year by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 558, Sec. 2.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Hire UP Program [78080. - 78084.]

78080.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Hire UP Pilot Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 27.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative March 15, 2029, pursuant to Section 78084.   Repealed January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 78084.)
-------------------------------------------

78081.

(a) The Hire UP Pilot Program is hereby established, to be administered by the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, for purposes of providing justice-involved individuals access to the credential programs and workforce support needed to enter, participate, and compete in California’s economy.

(b) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may enter into agreements with up to 10 community college districts for a five-year pilot program to provide funding for stipends to formerly incarcerated individuals, CalWORKs recipients, and former foster youth.

(2) Stipends provided under this article shall be equal to
 the state minimum wage for the duration of the academic program in which the student is enrolled.

(3) The stipend amount shall be determined based on the number of hours in the academic program, up to 40 hours per week for a full-time program.

(4) Students receiving stipends pursuant to this article shall have access to all supportive, academic, and professional services available through the Rising Scholars Network and their partners, or any services and programs offered by the participating community college district that are designed to benefit justice-involved students.

(5) Stipends provided pursuant to this article to students shall be distributed by their community college financial aid office.

(c) (1) The chancellor’s office
 shall develop an application for community college districts wishing to participate to apply for funding pursuant to this article by November 1, 2022, with funding distributed by May 1, 2023. The application shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) Current participation in the Rising Scholars Network or in another dedicated reentry program.

(B) A description of the mechanism the community college district will use to measure program and student success.

(C) A demonstration that the community college district has sufficient staff and resources to serve students in the program, including one dedicated student outreach and recruitment staff position and one dedicated workforce and industry development staff position.

(D) A commitment to serve a specified number of students, as established by the chancellor’s office.

(E) A description of the partners and services available to students participating in the program.

(F) A description of the local employers, industry recruiters, trade groups, career centers, and other workforce placement entities that the community college district will engage for the purpose of establishing a career pathway for students receiving a stipend pursuant to this article.

(2) The chancellor’s office shall establish requirements for community college districts related to program data collection and the number of stipend recipients per district.

(d) A community college student enrolled in a certificate or degree program at a
 California community college is eligible for a stipend if either of the following apply:

(1) The student has been released from incarceration within the last three years and is a current participant in the Rising Scholars Network or in another dedicated reentry program.

(2) The student is a CalWORKs recipient or former foster youth.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 27.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative March 15, 2029, pursuant to Section 78084.   Repealed January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 78084.)
-------------------------------------------

78082.

(a) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Legislature on or before March 1, 2025, and annually thereafter until a final report is submitted on March 1, 2029, on the implementation of the pilot program, including, but not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) The number of students receiving a stipend pursuant to this article.

(B) The degree or training program the student has completed or is participating in.

(C) The name of each community college district participating pursuant to this article.

(D) The outcomes for all participants, including employment, additional education, or business startups.

(E) The percentage of students employed in the field in which they received a degree or completed training.

(F) The degree to which Hire UP supportive services acknowledge and address historic racial inequity and socioeconomic barriers to workforce participation for the target population groups.

(G) The impact of the pilot program on the target population
 groups, including key conclusions and policy recommendations to provide guidance to the Legislature and the Governor.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) Participating community college districts shall provide all of the information in subdivision (a) to the chancellor’s office to facilitate pilot program evaluation.

(c) Participating community college districts and community partners may be required to participate in technical assistance activities, including, but not limited to, convening practice communities to identify and help replicate evidence-based practices and facilitate an assessment and evaluation of the performance and success of the pilot program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 9.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Inoperative March 15, 2029, pursuant to Section 78084.   Repealed January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 78084.)
-------------------------------------------

78083.

Funding for the Hire UP pilot program shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article, up to a total of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000). Funding for the Hire UP pilot program shall not draw from, supplant, or redirect existing state or federally funded education, workforce development, or employment services programs, except that those funds may, but shall not be required to, be used as leverage with Hire UP funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 27.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative March 15, 2029, pursuant to Section 78084.   Repealed January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 78084.)
-------------------------------------------

78084.

This article shall become inoperative on March 15, 2029, and as of January 1, 2030, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 10.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 7 commencing with Section 78080.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. The Community College Student Access, Retention, and Debt Cancellation Program [78090. - 78090.]

78090.

(a) The Community College Student Access, Retention, and Debt Cancellation Program is hereby established.

(b) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate funds on a one-time basis to community college districts to support efforts to increase student retention rates and enrollment by engaging former community college students who may have withdrawn from a community college district due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, current community college students who may be hesitant to remain enrolled at a community college district due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic, and prospective students who may be hesitant to enroll at a
 community college district due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(c) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall prioritize the use of allocated funds received pursuant to subdivision (b) for community colleges in the district with the largest declines in enrollment due to the impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic.

(2) A community college district may use funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) to provide a fiscal incentive for students to reenroll, or for prospective students to enroll, at the community college.

(3) A community college district may use funds allocated pursuant to subdivision (b) to discharge
 unpaid fees due or owed by a student to a community college in the district.

(d) In considering the allocation methodology to community college districts, the chancellor shall allocate additional funds to community
 college districts that have the most significant declines in unduplicated student headcount since Fall 2019.

(e) The chancellor may allocate up to 10 percent of the funds appropriated for purposes of the program to support statewide
 recruitment and retention efforts.

(f) Implementation of the program established pursuant to this section is contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.   (AB 1958)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Credit for Prior Learning Initiative [78093. - 78093.2.]

78093.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

78093.1.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Campus” means a campus of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Credit for prior learning” means college credit awarded for validated skills and competencies gained through experiences inside or outside of traditional academic settings, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Military training and service.

(2) Industry-recognized credentials, certifications, and licenses.

(3) Registered and nontraditional apprenticeships.

(4) Workplace learning, internships, and employment experience.

(d) “Credit recommendation” means a formal assessment of prior learning that recommends specific college-level course credits, general education area credits, or elective credits developed through evaluation by recognized entities, including the American Council on Education, California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups, or local discipline faculty experts, and documented in detailed exhibits for faculty credit evaluation.

(e) “Independent institution of higher education” has the same meaning as defined in Section 66010.

(f) “Validated” means a formal determination by California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups of all of the following:

(1) The skills and competencies gained through prior learning experiences are equivalent to California Community Colleges student learning outcomes or objectives gained through one or more college courses.

(2) The prior learning has been assessed using faculty discipline-approved methods and approved through established curricular processes and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

78093.2.

(a) Building upon the California Mapping Articulated Pathways Initiative, the chancellor’s office shall support the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative as a systemwide initiative to award credit for prior learning opportunities at each campus. The Credit for Prior Learning Initiative shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Implementation and maintenance of a systemwide process to identify students who may qualify for credit for prior learning. This process shall include all of the following:

(A) (i) The collection and analysis of documents and information during the college exploration and admissions process about relevant prior
 learning experiences to inform potential students of program, college, and career opportunities and the potential to receive credit for prior learning.

(ii) The documents and information referenced in clause (i) may include industry certifications, military service, workplace training, and other sources of prior learning, including, but not limited to, Joint Services Transcripts for military learners, industry certifications and licenses for working learners and apprentices, standardized examination scores, high school articulated coursework, and portfolios.

(B) Early notification to students about credit for prior learning opportunities that is consistent with their educational goals.

(C) A system to refer students identified pursuant to this paragraph to appropriate college personnel for a credit for prior learning
 assessment.

(2) A statewide technology infrastructure developed and maintained to make credit for prior learning opportunities visible and accessible to the public.

(3) Support for California Community Colleges faculty discipline review groups to develop credit recommendations for awarding credit for prior learning that campuses may adopt systemwide.

(4) Support for partnerships with workforce agencies, industry organizations, and educational institutions to expand credit for prior learning opportunities consistent with this article.

(5) Enable, document, and validate skills and competencies earned through educational, workplace, military, and other experiences of prior learning.

(b) Each
 campus shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Before or upon completion of the education plans pursuant to Section 78212, evaluate prior learning documents and credentials of all incoming students for the assessment and award of credit for prior learning. Prior learning documents and credentials include, but are not limited to, Joint Services Transcripts for veterans, reservists, and active duty members of the Armed Forces of the United States, industry-recognized credentials of working learners and apprentices, portfolios for self-directed and experiential learners, and standardized assessments, including, but not limited to, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and College-Level Examination Program assessments.

(2) Accept transcribed credit for prior learning from other campuses as credit, including for general education, transfer, and major preparation.

(c) (1) The California Community Colleges system, in partnership with the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges, shall collaborate with the Academic Senate of the California State University and other systemwide leadership of the California State University, and is encouraged to collaborate with the Academic Senate of the University of California and other systemwide leadership of the University of California to accomplish all of the following:

(A) Ensure that all campus-transcribed credit for prior learning is accepted as transfer credit, including for general education and major preparation.

(B) Participate in intersegmental alignment of credit for prior learning policies.

(C) Include credit for prior learning
 opportunities in published transfer pathways and, to the extent feasible, associate degree for transfer programs.

(2) To the extent that resources are available, the California Community Colleges system may collaborate with available and interested independent institutions of higher education.

(d) (1) Upon appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this article, the chancellor’s office shall allocate designated funds to support implementation of this article at each campus using all of the following goals:

(A) Increasing access to credit for prior learning opportunities equitably for all eligible students.

(B) Increasing completion through credit for prior learning awards.

(C) Advancing career attainment through credit for prior learning.

(D) Supporting credit for prior learning opportunities through the chancellor’s office’s pilot projects, such as the California Mapping Articulated Pathways Initiative.

(2) Each campus shall demonstrate that it has implemented the credit for prior learning initiative established pursuant to this article through the metrics described in paragraph (1) before receiving an allocation of funding for purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 16.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Library Services [78100. - 78103.]

78100.

The governing board of each community college district shall provide library services for the students and faculty of the district by establishing and maintaining community college libraries or by contractual arrangements with another public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1038, Sec. 5.5.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

78101.

The board of governors shall adopt standards, rules, and regulations for community college library services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

78103.

The libraries shall be open for the use of the faculty and the students of the community college district during the day. In addition, the libraries may be open at other hours, including evenings and Saturdays, as the governing board may determine. Libraries open to serve students during evening and Saturday hours shall be under the supervision of academic personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 654, Sec. 19.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Courses of Study [78210. - 78300.]



  ARTICLE 1. Student Matriculation [78210. - 78219.]

78210.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 3.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78211.

It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(a) Ensure equal education opportunity for all Californians.

(b) Provide students with the resources and support to establish informed educational choices aligned with their academic and career goals.

(c) Ensure that students receive the educational services necessary to optimize their opportunities for success in completing their educational goals and courses of study.

(d) Recognize that student success is the responsibility of the institution and
 student, supported by well-coordinated and evidence-based student and instructional services to foster academic success.

(e) Target state resources on the provision of critical student services, such as counseling and student advising, and identify a broad array of service delivery mechanisms that can effectively reach a greater number of students.

(f) Recognize the importance for community college districts of establishing local and regional partnerships with school districts, workforce agencies, and other system partners to leverage resources to assist students in exploring career options, preparing for college, and developing and achieving educational goals and plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 4.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78211.5.

(a) The purpose of the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 is to increase California community college student access and success by providing effective core matriculation services, including orientation, assessment and placement, counseling, and other education planning services, and academic interventions. The focus of the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 is on the entering students’ transition into college in order to provide a foundation for student achievement and successful completion of students’ educational goals, with a priority toward serving students who enroll to earn degrees, career technical certificates, transfer preparation, or career advancement. The Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 targets state
 resources on core matriculation services that research has shown to be critical in increasing the ability of students to reach their academic and career goals. By focusing funding in these core areas and leveraging the use of technology to more efficiently and effectively serve a greater number of students, the goal of the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012 is to provide students with a solid foundation and opportunity for success in the California Community Colleges.

(b) Any college or district receiving funding under this article shall agree to carry out its provisions as specified, but shall be bound to that agreement only for the period during which funding is received pursuant to this article. The obligations of the college or district under the agreement shall include, but not be limited to, the expenditure of funds received pursuant to this article for only those services approved by the board of governors and the contribution
 toward the purposes of this article of matching funds as the board of governors may require pursuant to Section 78216.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 5.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78212.

(a) (1) For purposes of this article, “matriculation” means a process that brings a college and a student into an agreement for the purpose of achieving the student’s educational goals and completing the student’s course of study. The agreement involves the responsibilities of both parties to attain those objectives through the college’s established programs, policies, and requirements including those established by the board of governors pursuant to Section 78215.

(2) The institution’s responsibility under the agreement includes the provision of student services to provide a strong foundation and support for their academic success and ability to achieve their
 educational goals. The program of services funded through the Seymour-Campbell Student Success Act of 2012, which shall be known and may be cited as the Student Success and Support Program, shall include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Orientation services designed to provide to students, on a timely basis, information concerning campus procedures, academic expectations, financial assistance, and any other matters the college or district finds appropriate.

(B) Assessment before course registration, as defined in Section 78213.

(C) Counseling and other education planning services, which shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(i) Counseling and advising.

(ii) Assistance to students in the exploration of educational and career interests and aptitudes and identification of educational objectives, including, but not limited to, preparation for transfer, associate degrees, and career technical education certificates and licenses.

(iii) The provision of information, guided by sound counseling principles and practices, using a broad array of delivery mechanisms, including technology-based strategies to serve a continuum of student needs and abilities, that will enable students to make informed choices.

(iv) Development of an education plan leading to a course of study and guidance on course selection that is informed by, and related to, a student’s academic and career goals.

(D) Referral to specialized support
 services as needed and available, including, but not necessarily limited to, federal, state, and local financial assistance; health services; career services; veteran support services; foster youth services; extended opportunity programs and services provided pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5; campus child care services provided pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8225) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1; programs that teach basic skills education and English as a second language; and disabled student services provided pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 67300) of Part 40 of Division 5.

(E) Evaluation of each student’s progress and referral to appropriate interventions for students who are enrolled in basic skills courses, who have not declared an educational goal as required, or who are on academic probation, as defined by standards adopted by the
 Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and community college districts.

(3) The student’s responsibilities under the agreement include, but are not necessarily limited to, the identification of an academic and career goal upon application, the declaration of a specific course of study after a specified time period or unit accumulation, as defined by the board of governors, diligence in class attendance and completion of assigned coursework, and the completion of courses and maintenance of academic progress toward an educational goal and course of study identified in the student’s education plan. To ensure that students are not unfairly impacted by the requirements of this chapter, the board of governors shall establish a reasonable implementation period that is phased in as resources are available to provide nonexempt students with the core services pursuant to this section.

(b) Funding for the Student Success and Support Program shall be targeted to fully implement orientation, assessment, counseling and advising, and other education planning services needed to assist a student in making an informed decision about his or her educational goal and course of study and in the development of an education plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.   (SB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: See provision in Section 78218 making operation contingent upon funding.)
-------------------------------------------

78212.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, pursuant to Sections 78213 and 78213.1, all of the following are satisfied:

(a) All United States high school graduate students and those who have received a high school equivalency certificate, regardless of background or special population status, who plan to pursue a certificate, degree, or transfer program offered by the California Community Colleges, shall be directly placed into, and, when beginning coursework in English or mathematics, shall be enrolled in, transfer-level English and mathematics courses if their program requires mathematics or English.

(b) California community colleges shall place and enroll students into transfer-level mathematics or English coursework
 that satisfies a requirement of the student’s intended certificate or associate degree or a requirement for transfer within their intended major.

(c) When the California State University and University of California systems require mathematics or English prerequisites, both of the following apply:

(1) Community colleges shall determine the methods of fulfilling the prerequisite, whether it be through high school coursework, completion of corequisite coursework or concurrent support activity, credit by examination, credit for prior learning, or multiple measures placement into, or completion of, a course with the same or higher prerequisite.

(2) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, work collaboratively with the California Community Colleges to maintain articulation
 of courses successfully completed at the California Community Colleges.

(d) California community colleges create the largest opportunities possible for access to transfer-level courses, ensure the greatest enrollment possible into those courses, and provide students the support they need to perform well and be successful in completing those courses.

(e) In order to protect the rights of students with disabilities to fully benefit from participation in postsecondary educational programs, students with documented disabilities shall retain access to educational assistance classes, as described in Section 56028 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, that are offered to students who otherwise would not be able to benefit from general college classes even with appropriate academic adjustments, auxiliary aids, and services.
